Hawaii statutes.
[§321-544] License fee. The
department may assess a license fee of no more than $350 on each durable
medical equipment supplier who receives a license pursuant to section 321-543.
The license fee collected shall be deposited into the office of health care
assurance special fund pursuant to section 321-1.4. [L 2016, c 137, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next